Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.16, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Exemption for small gas utility franchise. (a) A municipality may file with the commission a resolution of deleted text begin itsdeleted text end new text begin the municipality'snew text end governing body requesting exemption from the provisions of this section for a public utility that is under a franchise with the municipality to supply natural, manufactured, or mixed gas and that serves deleted text begin 650deleted text end new text begin 2,500new text end or fewer customers in the municipality deleted text begin as long asdeleted text end new text begin ifnew text end the public utility serves no more than a total of 5,000 customersnew text begin : (1) from the system serving the municipality; and (2) located outside the municipality's corporate limits, as provided under paragraph (b), if applicablenew text end . (b) The commission shall grant an exemption from this section for that portion of a public utility's business that is requested by each municipality it serves. deleted text begin Furthermore,deleted text end The commission shall also grant the public utility an exemption from this section for any service provided new text begin by a system to customers located new text end outside of a municipality's deleted text begin border that is considered by the commission to be incidental. The public utility shall file with the commission and the department all initial and subsequent changes in rates, tariffs, and contracts for service outside the municipality at least 30 days in advance of implementationdeleted text end new text begin corporate limits, provided that the same applicable tariff rates apply to customers located outside the municipality's corporate limits as apply to customers located within the municipality's corporate limitsnew text end . (c) deleted text begin However,deleted text end The commission shall require the new text begin public new text end utility to adopt the commission's policies and procedures governing disconnection during cold weather. The utility shall annually submit a copy of its municipally approved rates to the commission. (d) In all cases covered by this subdivision in which an exemption for service outside of a municipality is granted, the commission may initiate an investigation under section 216B.17, on its own motion or upon complaint from a customer. (e) If a municipality files with the commission a resolution of its governing body rescinding the request for exemption, the commission shall regulate the public utility's business in that municipality under this section. new text begin (f) For the purposes of this subdivision, "system" means physically connected infrastructure that: new text end new text begin (1) is owned and operated by a public utility that is subject to this subdivision and receives wholesale natural, manufactured, or mixed gas from a supplier and delivers the gas to the public utility's customers; and new text end new text begin (2) is not physically connected to another system owned and operated by the same public utility. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end